Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.72.070

Perjury and false swearing—Irregularities no defense.

It is no defense to a prosecution for perjury or false swearing:

(1) That the oath was administered or taken in an irregular manner; or

(2) That the person administering the oath lacked authority to do so, if the taking of the oath was required or authorized by law.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.72.070.]